New Jersey, session 222, A4252.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2024, c.63 (C.45:14F-21.1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a.  No holder of a license or certification under P.L.1991, c.68 (C.45:14F-1 et seq.) or registration under P.L.2017, c.72 (C.45:14F-27 et al.) shall consider, as part of a real estate appraisal, the race, color, religion, sex, actual or perceived sexual orientation, actual or perceived gender identity, age, actual or perceived marital status, disability, familial status, or national origin of either the prospective owners or occupants of the real estate or real property, the present owners or occupants of the real estate or real property, or the present owners or occupants of the real estate or real properties in the vicinity of the property, or on any other basis prohibited by federal, State, or local law.  A holder of a license, certificate, or registration that is found to have discriminated in the appraisal of real estate in violation of this subsection shall be in violation of the Law Against Discrimination, P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). b.   (1) If the holder of a license, certificate, or registration is found to have discriminated in the appraisal of real estate in violation of subsection a. of this section, the discriminatory appraisal shall be void and of no effect and, for a first violation, the board shall: (a)  order the holder to make restitution of the cost of the discriminatory appraisal; and (b)  require the holder to attend an anti-bias seminar approved by the board that shall include information on existing anti-discrimination laws and how they relate to housing and appraisals. (2)  If the holder of a license, certificate, or registration is found to have committed a second violation of subsection a. of this section, the board shall: (a)  suspend the license, certificate, or registration and order the holder to make restitution of the cost of the discriminatory appraisal; and (b)  require the holder to attend an anti-bias seminar approved by the board that shall include information on existing anti-discrimination laws and how they relate to housing and appraisals. (3)  The board may restore the license, certificate, or registration of a holder found to have committed a second violation of subsection a. of this section upon proof that the holder made restitution required pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (2) of this subsection and attended the anti-bias seminar approved by the board after a period of suspension of no less than 30 days. (4)  If the holder of a license, certificate, or registration is found to have committed a third violation of subsection a. of this section, the board shall, after appropriate notice and hearing, revoke the license, certificate, or registration and order the holder to make restitution of the cost of the discriminatory appraisal. (5)  The holder of a license, certificate, or registration that is found to have committed a violation of subsection a. of this section shall also be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for a first violation, $25,000 for a second violation occurring within five years of the first, and $50,000 for a third violation.  A civil penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be collected by the board pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). (6)  Any discriminatory appraisal of real estate by the holder of a license, certificate, or registration pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be void and of no effect. c.   Whenever the board finds cause to suspend the license, certificate or registration of a holder pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, the board shall notify the holder of the reasons therefor, in writing, and provide opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  The board shall also provide the notification to the Division on Civil Rights within the Department of Law and Public Safety for review and appropriate action. d.   Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit in any way the boards authority to take any action against the holder of a license, certificate, or registration based on discriminatory conduct or for any other reason or to limit any rights protected by or powers afforded to the Division on Civil Rights pursuant to the Law Against Discrimination, P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). e.     When the board receives a complaint of appraisal discrimination pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the board shall notify a complainant under this section of the option to file a complaint with the Division on Civil Rights pursuant to the Law Against Discrimination, P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.) and notify the Division on Civil Rights of the complaint of appraisal discrimination within 14 days of receiving the complaint.  Any complaints of alleged discrimination shall be received and investigated by the Division on Civil Rights.  If, upon investigation, a finding of discrimination is made, the division shall forward its findings to the board. f.     This section shall be in addition to and shall not be construed to supersede the provisions of any other federal or State law prohibiting such conduct. (cf: P.L.2024, c.63, s.1) 2.    (New section)  a.  Within three days of a first interaction with a present owner or occupant of the real estate or real property, or the agent of the present owner or occupant, a licensed real estate broker, broker-salesperson, or salesperson shall provide the owner or occupant, or agent of the owner or occupant, with a document, given free of charge and in a form and manner prescribed by the board, informing the owner or occupant of the opportunity to report, through the Internet website or telephone number of the Division on Civil Rights in the Department of Law and Public Safety, any suspicion of a discriminatory appraisal by the holder of a license, certificate, or registration pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2024, c.63 (C.       ). b.    During a private sale of real estate, the present owner of the real estate or real property, or the agent of the present owner, shall provide a prospective owner of the real estate or real property or agent of the prospective owner with a document, given free of charge and in a form and manner prescribed by the board, informing the prospective owner of the opportunity to report, through the Internet website or telephone number of the Division on Civil Rights in the Department of Law and Public Safety, any suspicion of a discriminatory appraisal by the holder of a license, certificate, or registration pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2024, c.63 (C.       ).  The document shall be provided to the prospective owner or agent of the prospective owner within three days of the prospective owner signing a real estate purchase agreement with the present owner. c.     Within three days of receiving an application for a mortgage loan, a licensed mortgage broker, real estate broker, broker-salesperson, or other mortgage salesperson shall provide the applicant with a document, given free of charge and in a form and manner prescribed by the board, informing the applicant of the opportunity to report, through the Internet website or telephone number of the Division on Civil Rights in the Department of Law and Public Safety, any suspicion of a discriminatory appraisal by the holder of a license, certificate or registration pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2024, c.63 (C. ). d.    (1)  When receiving a report of an alleged discriminatory appraisal, the Division on Civil Rights shall ascertain the basis for the allegation and solicit from the complainant relevant demographic information, including but not limited to, the identity of the complainant within the characteristics listed pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2024, c.63 (C.        ).  The complainant may provide the demographic information solicited by the division on a voluntary basis. (2)   The division shall compile the demographic information of the complainants provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall report in the aggregate the demographic information collected to the Governor and to the Legislature in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) on or before July 1, 2026. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day next following enactment.